Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-810
Withdrawal of affiliation.

An affiliate of a public library federation may, by a two-thirds majority vote of the local governing authority, withdraw from affiliation with the federation after giving one year's notice.

Laws 1999, LB 362, § 10.